Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1311
Instruments; signatures; illegible; refusal to file.

The name or names of each signer of an instrument presented for filing or recording in the office of the county clerk or register of deeds, including the name of any notary or official taking the acknowledgment, shall be typewritten or legibly printed beneath such signature. The county clerk or register of deeds may refuse to accept and file any instrument failing to meet the requirements of this section, except that if the county clerk or register of deeds determines that all signatures on the instrument are legible, the county clerk or register of deeds shall not refuse to file the instrument.

Laws 1959, c. 90, § 1, p. 400;

Laws 2018, LB786, § 2.